Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska87-215
False representation
or declaration; damages.

Any person who, for himself
or herself or on behalf of any other person, procures the registration of
any trade name in the office of the Secretary of State under the provisions
of sections 87-208 to 87-219.01, by knowingly making
any false or fraudulent representation or declaration, verbally or in writing,
or by any other fraudulent means, shall be liable to pay all damages sustained
in consequence of this filing or registration, to be recovered by any party
injured in any court of competent jurisdiction.

Laws 1967, c. 628, § 8, p. 2102;

Laws 1997, LB 453, § 13;

Laws 2011, LB462, § 15.